Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201884-901.01
Adoption and promulgation of rules and regulations; time; failure to adopt and promulgate; explanation; contents; hearing by standing committee of the Legislature; effect of legislative changes.

(1) When legislation is enacted requiring the adoption and promulgation of rules and regulations by an agency, such agency shall adopt and promulgate such rules and regulations within one year after the public hearing required under subsection (2) of section 84-907. Such time shall not include the time necessary for submission of the rules and regulations to the Attorney General pursuant to section 84-905.01 or submission of the rules and regulations to the Governor pursuant to section 84-908. Any agency which does not adopt and promulgate such rules and regulations as required by this section shall, upon request, submit an explanation to the Executive Board of the Legislative Council and the standing committee of the Legislature which has subject matter jurisdiction over the issue involved in the legislation, stating the reasons why it has not adopted such rules and regulations as required by this section, the date by which the agency expects to adopt such rules and regulations, and any suggested statutory changes that may enable the agency to adopt such rules and regulations.

(2) If such agency has not adopted and promulgated such rules and regulations within three years after the operative or effective date of such enacting legislation, the standing committee of the Legislature which has subject matter jurisdiction over the matters included in the legislation shall hold a public hearing to determine the reason that such rules and regulations have not been enacted.

(3) The changes made to the Administrative Procedure Act by Laws 2011, LB617, shall not affect the validity or effectiveness of a rule or regulation adopted prior to May 25, 2011.

(4) The changes made to this section by Laws 2013, LB242, shall apply to legislation enacted before, on, or after September 6, 2013.

Laws 2011, LB617, § 1;

Laws 2012, LB782, § 227;

Laws 2013, LB222, § 42;

Laws 2013, LB242, § 2;

Laws 2018, LB751, § 1.